Mississippi statutes. Title 69. Agriculture, Horticulture, and Animals
Article 17. Weighing Devices for Farm-Raised Catfish.

§ 69-7-701.
Use of weighing device by catfish processors.

For purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the meaning ascribed herein unless the context otherwise requires:

“Catfish” means any species within the family of Ictaluridae.

“Processor” means any person engaged in handling, storing, preparing, manufacturing, packing or holding catfish products.

When making a weight determination of farm-raised catfish, the processor shall weigh the catfish as they are unloaded from the live haul truck and shall drain any water from the weighing baskets before the catfish are weighed. No deductions shall be made thereafter for water in the weighing baskets. The processor shall also use a weighing device that is of a type suitable for the weighing of farm-raised catfish and subject to the provisions of Section 75-27-19, Mississippi Code of 1972.

Such weighing device shall electronically print a ticket which provides an exact duplicate of the weight indicated. A copy of this ticket shall be furnished to the owner of the catfish. Such ticket shall also include, but is not limited to, the following:

The name and address of the processor;

The name of the owner of the catfish being weighed;

The date the catfish is weighed;

The signature of the individual who weighs the farm-raised catfish recorded on the weight ticket;

The device should print zero (0) before each weighing; and

Such additional information as the Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce deems necessary for the lawful and accurate recording of the weight of farm-raised catfish.

Deductions for trash fish, turtles and other foreign materials shall be determined by a separate electronic weighing of the same with a printed ticket provided to the producer.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 301, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 469, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 377, § 6; Laws, 2005, ch. 390, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 16, 2005.).